Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
12 SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
13 codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
14 This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Retirement
15 Reform Act of 2025".
16 SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
17
18 60-1-10268 CMA 12/30/24
19
20
21
22
23
24
Req. No. 10268 Page 1

THOMAS E. CUMMINS CONSULTING ACTUARY, INC.
2512 E. 71st Street , Suite D ∙ Tulsa, Oklahoma 74136
(918) 492-9658 ∙ (918) 492- 9659
January 2, 2025
Representative Patzkowsky
Room 335N
Re: RBH No. 10268
RBH No. 10268 is a shell bill.
RBH No. 10268 is a non fiscal bill as defined by OPLAAA.
I am a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and meet the
Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to
render the actuarial opinion herein.
Thomas E. Cummins
Thomas E. Cummins, MAAA